test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-IA-mato_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mâto - cry : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm

     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâton
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâton
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâtow
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mâtoyiwa
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâtonân
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâtonaw, kimâtonânaw]
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâtonâwâw
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâtowak
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mâtoyiwa
   
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîmâton, nikî-mâton]
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîmâton, kikî-mâton]
     mâtow+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîmâtow, kî-mâtow]
   
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâtoyân, êmâtoyân]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâtoyan, êmâtoyan]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâtot, êmâtot]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâtoyâhk, êmâtoyâhk]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâtoyahk, êmâtoyahk]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâtoyêk, êmâtoyêk]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâtocik, êmâtocik]
     mâtow+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]
   
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâto
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâtok
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâtotân
   
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâtohkan
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâtohkêk
     mâtow+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâtohkahk
